Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1513
Department; review needs of support recipient.

The department shall review the needs of each family or disabled person receiving support under sections 68-1501 to 68-1519 on a regular basis, as established by the department, or upon the showing of a change of circumstances by the head of the family.

Laws 1981, LB 389, § 13.